Washington statutes.
RCW 33.24.030

Obligations of this state.

An association may invest its funds in the bonds or interest bearing obligations of this state or any agency thereof.

[ 1955 c 126 s 1; 1945 c 235 s 60; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-179. Prior: 1939 c 98 s 11; 1933 c 183 s 56.]